Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 2 The Code and Regulations
1-2-308. Acts amending Arkansas Constitution.

(a)(1)

If an act of the General Assembly amends a provision of the Arkansas Constitution as expressly permitted by the Arkansas Constitution, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, make the following revisions to the act amending the Arkansas Constitution so long as the revisions do not change the substance or meaning of the act amending the Arkansas Constitution:

(A)

Correct the spelling of words;

(B)

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

(C)

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

(D)

Correct manifest errors in references to laws and other documents;

(E)

Correct manifest errors in internal reference numbers;

(F)

Number, renumber, redesignate, and rearrange the provision of the Arkansas Constitution at issue;

(G)

Change internal reference numbers to agree with renumbered sections, subsections, subdivisions, or other provisions of law;

(H)

Insert or delete hyphens in words to follow correct grammatical usage;

(I)

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa and add figures or words if they are merely repetitions of written words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

(J)

Change the form of nouns, pronouns, and verbs for purposes of style and grammar;

(K)

Correct punctuation; and

(L)

Change gender-specific language to gender-neutral language.

(2)(A)

If more than one (1) act amending the same provision of the Arkansas Constitution is enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, the commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, revise the provision of the Arkansas Constitution at issue as necessary so that all of the enactments shall be given effect, including without limitation renumbering, redesignating, and rearranging sections, subsections, and subdivisions of the provision of the Arkansas Constitution at issue.

(B)

In the event that one (1) or more acts amending the same provision of the Arkansas Constitution result in an irreconcilable conflict with one (1) or more acts of the General Assembly amending the Arkansas Constitution enacted during the same session, the commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, revise the provision of the Arkansas Constitution at issue so that the conflicting provision of the last enactment prevails.

(b)

If the commission makes revisions under subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall file a report with the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor that:

(1)

Explains the revisions made under subsection (a) of this section; and

(2)

Includes the text of the provision of the Arkansas Constitution at issue as amended by the revisions made under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 694, § 7.

Subchapter 4

— Commission on Uniform State Laws

1-2-401. Creation — Members.

(a)

A commission is created to be known as the “Commission on Uniform State Laws”. The commission shall consist of three (3) recognized members of the bar who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four (4) years each and until their successors are appointed and, in addition thereto, any residents of this state who, because of long service in the cause of uniformity of state legislation, shall have been elected life members of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

(b)

Upon the death, removal from the state, resignation, failure, or refusal to serve of any appointed commissioner, the appointed office becomes vacant and the Governor shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 159, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-401, 6-402.

1-2-402. Meetings and organization.

The commissioners of the Commission on Uniform State Laws shall meet at least one (1) time in two (2) years and shall organize by means of the election of one (1) of their number as chair and another as secretary, who shall hold their respective offices for a term of two (2) years and until their successors are appointed.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 159, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-403.

1-2-403. Duties.

(a)

Each commissioner of the Commission on Uniform State Laws shall attend the meetings of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws and, both in and out of the National Conference, shall do all in his or her power to promote uniformity in state laws upon all subjects where uniformity may be deemed desirable and practicable.

(b)

The Commission on Uniform State Laws shall report to the General Assembly at each regular session, and from time to time thereafter as the Commission on Uniform State Laws may deem proper, an account of its transactions and its advice and recommendations for legislation.

(c)

It shall also be the duty of the Commission on Uniform State Laws to bring about, as far as practicable, the uniform judicial interpretation of all uniform laws.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 159, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-404.

Subchapter 5

— Minorities in Arkansas Act of 2001

1-2-501. Short title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Minorities in Arkansas Act of 2001”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1394, § 1.

1-2-502. Legislative findings.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that there are great disparities in the definition of “minority” in the Arkansas Code, and it would be advantageous to have a consistent definition of minority in the State of Arkansas.

(b)

The General Assembly also recognizes that the number of people settling in Arkansas who are Hispanic immigrants or are of Hispanic background is rapidly increasing, and it would be advantageous to include Hispanics in the definition of “minority” in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1394, § 2.

1-2-503. “Minority” defined.

For terms of Arkansas law, “minority” means black or African American, Hispanic American, American Indian or Native American, Asian, and Pacific Islander.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1394, § 3.

1-2-504. Other definitions of “minority”.

(a)

When enacting specific laws, the definition of “minority” shall be expanded to include other racial or ethnic groups when it is considered necessary by a legislative body.

(b)

However, under no circumstances should the definition of “minority” exclude black Americans or African Americans, Hispanic Americans, or American Indians or Native Americans.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1394, § 4.